Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.03.020

General powers.

(1) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name.

(2) Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its business and affairs, including without limitation, power:

(a) To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name;

(b) To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

(c) To make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

(d) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

(e) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

(f) To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any person;

(g) To make contracts, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

(h) To make guarantees respecting the contracts, securities, or obligations of any person; including, but not limited to, any shareholder, affiliated or unaffiliated individual, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, association, joint venture or trust, if such guarantee may reasonably be expected to benefit, directly or indirectly, the guarantor corporation. As to the enforceability of the guarantee, the decision of the board of directors that the guarantee may be reasonably expected to benefit, directly or indirectly, the guarantor corporation shall be binding in respect to the issue of benefit to the guarantor corporation;

(i) To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

(j) To be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

(k) To conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this title within or without this state;

(l) To elect, appoint, or hire officers, employees, and other agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

(m) To fix the compensation of directors, and lend them money and credit;

(n) To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

(o) To make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

(p) To transact any lawful business that will aid governmental policy; and

(q) To make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the business and affairs of the corporation.

[ 1989 c 165 s 34.]